District of Columbia statutes.
35-237

Rules and regulations.

The Mayor shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out §§ 35-232 to 35-237, including rules and regulations relating to the maximum number of Metrobus student fare tokens and Metrorail student farecards that may be purchased by an eligible student at any 1 time or during a specific period of time, and relating to the use or the prohibition of use of fare tokens, tickets and farecards for the transportation of students going to and from school programs and related activities held in the District of Columbia on weekends and holidays.

Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-152, § 2, 25 DCR 2534
Sept. 26, 1981, D.C. Law 4-33, § 2(e), 28 DCR 3187
1973 Ed., § 44-214.6.
1981 Ed., § 44-221.